District of Columbia statutes.
41-131

Confidentiality.

Any information or records required to be furnished to the Mayor as provided in this chapter shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person except the person who furnished the same to the Mayor and except as provided in §§ 41-118 and 41-123 or as may be necessary in the proper administration of this chapter alone.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 131, 27 DCR 5150
1981 Ed., § 42-231.
Uniform Law: This section is similar to § 20(d) of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1995 Act).